North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-01.1 Health Data Committee [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 207, § 6]

23-01.1-01.
Health data committee of state health council — Membership — Appointment by chairman of health council. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 292, § 1; Repealed by 2013, ch. 207, § 1, eff August 1, 2015.

23-01.1-02.
Powers of health data committee. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 292, § 2; 1991, ch. 262, § 2; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; Repealed by 2013, ch. 207, § 2, eff August 1, 2015.

23-01.1-03.
Publication of a directory of licensed physicians. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 262, § 4.

23-01.1-04.
Administrative authority of health data committee — Administrative support — Authority to acquire data. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 292, § 4; 1991, ch. 262, § 3; Repealed by 2013, ch. 207, § 3, eff August 1, 2015.

23-01.1-05.
Confidentiality of certain records — Immunity for providing information. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 292, § 5; Repealed by 2013, ch. 207, § 3, eff August 1, 2015.

23-01.1-06.
Fees for providing extraordinary data or reports. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 292, § 6; Repealed by 1995, ch. 243, § 2, eff August 1, 2015.

23-01.1-07.
Civil penalty. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 292, § 7; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; Repealed by 2013, ch. 207, § 4, eff August 1, 2015.